Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4235
Insurer; notice required.

Every insurer shall include a notice of the existence of the pool in (1) any rejection of an application for health insurance coverage for reasons of the health of the applicant and (2) any restrictive health insurance rider issued on or after January 1, 1999.

Laws 1985, LB 391, § 35;

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 43;

Laws 1998, LB 1063, § 4.